Missouri, session 2026, HB3516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.912, to read as follows:
227.912. The portion of U.S. Highway 63 from the southern access at CST East
2 Street/State Highway 17 continuing north to CST Main Street in Texas County shall be
3 designated the "Emmett Kelly Sr Memorial Highway". The department of
4 transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway,
5 with the costs to be paid by private donations.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.